Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1093.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 4(b) and (c) of the act of January 17, 1968 (P.L.11, No.5), known as The Minimum Wage Act of 1968, are amended, subsection (a) is amended by adding paragraphs and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 4. Minimum Wages.--Except as may otherwise be provided under this act:(a) Every employer shall pay to each of his or her employes wages for all hours worked at a rate of not less than:* * *(9) Nine dollars ($9.00) an hour beginning January 1, 2026.(10) Ten dollars ($10.00) an hour beginning January 1, 2027.12345678910111213141516171819202122 (11) Eleven dollars ($11.00) an hour beginning January 1, 2028.* * *(b) The [secretary, to the extent necessary to prevent curtailment of employment opportunities, shall by regulations provide for the employment of] minimum wage rate for learners and students, [under special certificates at wages lower than the minimum wage applicable under this section, and subject to such limitations as to number, proportion and length of service as the secretary shall prescribe: Provided, That the minimum wage prescribed under this subsection (b)] as those terms are defined in 34 Pa. Code § 231.1 (relating to definitions), shall [not] be [less than] eighty-five percent of the otherwise applicable wage rate in effect under section 4[. A special certificate issued under this subsection shall provide that for six or less students for whom it is issued shall]: Provided, That for students, this subsection shall only apply to students who are less than twenty years old and who, except during vacation periods, [be] are employed on a part-time basis and not in excess of twenty hours in any workweek at a sub-minimum rate.[In the case of an employer who intends to employ seven or more students, at a sub-minimum rate, the secretary may issue a special certificate only if the employer certifies to the secretary that employment of such students will not create a substantial probability of reducing the full-time employment opportunities for other workers.](c) Employes shall be paid for overtime not less than one and one-half times the employe's regular rate [as prescribed in regulations promulgated by the secretary] or basic rate in a manner consistent with 29 CFR Pts. 548 (relating to 20250SB1093PN1315 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 authorization of established basic rates for computing overtime pay) and 778 (relating to overtime compensation) as of June 1, 2025: Provided, That students employed in seasonal occupations as defined and delimited by regulations promulgated by the secretary may, by such regulations, be excluded from the overtime provisions of this act: And provided further, That the secretary shall promulgate regulations with respect to overtime subject to the limitations that no pay for overtime in addition to the regular rate shall be required except for hours in excess of forty hours in a workweek. An employer shall not be in violation of this subsection if the employer is entitled to utilize, and acts consistently with, section 7(j) of the Fair Labor Standards Act of 1938 (52 Stat. 1060, 29 U.S.C. § 207(j)) and regulations promulgated under that provision.* * *(f) An employer's obligation to compensate an employe, at minimum wage or overtime rates, for hours worked shall be interpreted in pari materia with the Fair Labor Standards Act (29 U.S.C. Ch.8) and section 4 of the Portal-to-Portal Act of 1947 (29 U.S.C. § 254), as amended, and Federal regulations promulgated thereunder, including under 29 CFR Pt. 785 (relating to hours worked), as of June 1, 2025.Section 2. Section 5(a)(5) and (12) and (c) of the act are amended and subsection (a) is amended by adding a paragraph to read:Section 5. Exemptions.--(a) Employment in the following classifications shall be exempt from both the minimum wage and overtime provisions of this act:* * *(5) In a bona fide executive, administrative, or 20250SB1093PN1315 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 professional capacity (including any employe employed in the capacity of academic administrative personnel or teacher in elementary or secondary schools) or in the capacity of outside salesman [(as], as such terms are defined and delimited [from time to time by regulations of the secretary, except that an employe of a retail or service establishment shall not be excluded from the definition of employe employed in a bona fide executive or administrative capacity because of the number of hours in his or her workweek which he or she devotes to activities not directly or closely related to the performance of executive administrative activities, if less than forty percent of his or her hours worked in the workweek are devoted to such activities);] in 29 CFR Pt. 541 (relating to defining and delimiting the exemptions for executive, administrative, professional, computer and outside sales employees) as of June 1, 2025, except that as of June 1, 2025, the secretary may further define and delimit the terms by regulation;* * *(12) Employes not subject to civil service laws who hold elective office or are on the personal staff of such an officeholder, are immediate advisers to him or her, or are appointed by him or her to serve on a policy-making level[.];(13) Employes who have entered into a contract to play baseball at the minor league level and who are compensated pursuant to the terms of a collective bargaining agreement that expressly provides for the wages and working conditions of the employes.* * *[(c) (1) Notwithstanding the provisions of section 4(a)(7) and (8), an employer unless otherwise exempt from the minimum 20250SB1093PN1315 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 wage provisions of section 4(a)(6) whose employe complement is composed of the equivalent of ten or less full-time employes to be calculated on a forty-hour workweek shall pay:(i) Five dollars sixty-five cents ($5.65) an hour beginning January 1, 2007.(ii) Six dollars sixty-five cents ($6.65) an hour beginning July 1, 2007.(2) Such employer shall pay the full amount of the minimum wage under section 4(a)(8) beginning July 1, 2008.]Section 3. Section 8 of the act is amended to read:Section 8. Duty of Employer.--Every employer of employes shall keep a true and accurate record of the hours worked by each employe and the wages paid to each, and shall furnish to the secretary or his or her duly authorized representative, upon demand, a sworn statement of the same. Such records shall be open to inspection by any duly authorized representative of the secretary at any reasonable time and shall be preserved for a period of three years. Every employer subject to this act shall keep a summary of this act and any regulations issued thereunder applicable to him or her, posted in a conspicuous place where employes normally pass and can read it. Employers shall, upon request, be furnished copies of such summaries without charge. Employers shall permit any duly authorized representative of the secretary to interrogate any employe in the place of employment and during work hours with respect to the wages paid to and the hours worked by such employe or other employes. This section shall not apply to an employe who has entered into a contract to play baseball at the minor league level and who is compensated pursuant to the terms of a collective bargaining agreement that expressly provides for the wages and working conditions of the 20250SB1093PN1315 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 employe.Section 4. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB1093PN1315 - 6 - 12